Massachusetts, session 194th, H3003.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
There shall be a commission to study and report on the cost and feasibility of awarding a
retirement credit to certain public employees who worked in their normal place of work,
performing their normal duties between March 13th 2020, and at least January 1st 2021. The
commission shall evaluate which employees should qualify for a credit, and by what criteria the
amount of that credit should be determined. Priority will be given to those employees who in the
normal course of their job continued to interact with members of the public or performed other
duties that put them at greater risk of exposure to covid-19. Employees who primarily worked
from their home, or who were not required as a condition of their employment to regularly report
to their normal place of work during this period shall not be eligible. Elected officials shall not
be eligible.
The commission shall be composed of 2 members appointed by each of the following, the
Speaker of the House, the Senate President, the Governor; 1 member appointed by each of the
of 2

following, the Minority Leader of the House, the Minority Leader of the Senate; 3 members
appointed by mutual agreement of the Speaker of the House, the Senate President, and the
Governor who serve in a leadership capacity in an association or union representing the interests
of the employees who would be eligible for the credit.
of 2